Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.901

Effective dates—1987 c 452.

(1) Sections 1 through 9 and 11 through 20 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1987.

(2) Section 10 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1989.

[ 1987 c 452 s 21.]